South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4523.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Sexual Offender Act." SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-1-150.   (A) In addition to the contents of a driver's license pursuant to Section 56-1-140 or a special identification card pursuant to Section 56-1-3350: (1) a person adjudicated as a sexually violent predator pursuant to Chapter 48, Title 44 must have "Sexually Violent Predator" printed in red on his driver's license or special identification card; or (2) a person who has not been adjudicated as sexually violent predator but is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 23 must have "Sex Offender" printed in red on his driver's license or identification card. (B) A person who is identified in subsection (A) has thirty days from being adjudicated or released from the Department of Corrections to turn in his current driver's license or special identification card and obtain a new driver's license or special identification card with the required sexual offender identifier. (C) The Department of Motor Vehicles may charge a fee for affixing the identifier provided in subsection (A). (D) Upon termination of sexually violent predator or sex offender status, the person may take documentation obtained from SLED to the Department of Motor Vehicles to obtain a driver's license or identification card that does not contain the identifier provided in subsection (A). (E) A person who violates a provision contained in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than three years and fined not more than five hundred dollars. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----